Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1132 Attendance compulsory;
exceptions. (a) Unless excluded from school or excepted from attendance,
all children who will have arrived at the age of at least five years on or
before July 31 of the school year, and who will not have arrived at the age of
eighteen years, by January 1 of any school year, shall attend either a
public or private school for, and during, the school year, and any parent,
guardian, or other person having the responsibility for, or care of, a child
whose attendance at school is obligatory shall send the child to either a
public or private school. Attendance at a public or private school shall not
be compulsory in the following cases:

(1) Where the child is physically or mentally unable
to attend school (deafness and blindness excepted), of which fact the
certificate of a duly licensed physician shall be sufficient evidence;

(2) Where the child, who has reached the fifteenth
anniversary of birth, is suitably employed and has been excused from school
attendance by the superintendent or the superintendent's authorized
representative, or by a family court judge;

(3) Where, upon investigation by the family court, it
has been shown that for any other reason the child may properly remain away
from school;

(4) Where the child has graduated from high school;

(5) Where the child is enrolled in an appropriate
alternative educational program as approved by the superintendent or the
superintendent's authorized representative in accordance with the plans and
policies of the department, or notification of intent to home school has been
submitted to the principal of the public school that the child would otherwise
be required to attend in accordance with department rules adopted to achieve
this result; or

(6) Where:

(A) The child has attained the age of sixteen
years;

(B) The principal has determined that:

(i) The child has engaged in behavior which is
disruptive to other students, teachers, or staff; or

(ii) The child's non-attendance is chronic and
has become a significant factor that hinders the child's learning; and

(C) The principal of the child's school, and
the child's teacher or counselor, in consultation with the child and the
child's parent, guardian, or other adult having legal responsibility for or
care of the child, develops an alternative educational plan for the child. The
alternative educational plan shall include a process that shall permit the
child to resume school.

The principal of the child's school shall file
the plan made pursuant to subparagraph (C) with the child's school record. If
the adult having legal responsibility for or care of the child disagrees with
the plan, then the adult shall be responsible for obtaining appropriate
educational services for the child.

(b) Any employer who employs a child who is
excused from school attendance in accordance with subsection (a)(2) shall
notify the child's school within three days upon termination of the child's
employment.

(c) Beginning with the 2014-2015 school year,
any parent, guardian, or other person having the responsibility for, or care
of, a child who will be at least five years of age on or before July 31 of the
school year shall enroll the child in a public school kindergarten unless the
child is enrolled at a private school or the child's attendance is otherwise
exempt under this section. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2 and am c 162, §2; am L 2014,
c 76, §3]

Cross References

Kindergartens; attendance, see §302A-411.

Case Notes

Because the State provides schooling for all children between
the ages of six and eighteen, plaintiff, a minor, had a property interest in
plaintiff's education. 950 F. Supp. 2d 1159 (2013).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next